Arkansas, session 2025, HB1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Qualified storm shelter.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Primary residence" means a single-family residence that is
the full-time legal residence of a taxpayer and is used for purposes of the
taxpayer's income tax calculation under this chapter;
(2) "Qualified storm shelter" means a storm shelter or safe room
that:
(A) Has a design that is capable of withstanding a tornado
that is rated as a five (5) on the Enhanced Fujita Scale;
(B) Is placed in service as an attachment to the
taxpayer's primary residence or on the same lot or parcel as the taxpayer's
primary residence, and no other qualified storm shelter is attached to the
taxpayer's primary residence or on the same lot or parcel as the taxpayer's
primary residence;
(C) Meets or exceeds the most recent minimum criteria
established by the Federal Emergency Management Agency for the design,
*JLL126*
01/30/2025 9:06:18 AM JLL126

HB1366
construction, and operation of residential safe rooms; and
(D) Is built on the site of the taxpayer's primary
residence or is manufactured offsite and installed on the site of the
taxpayer's primary residence; and
(3) "Single-family residence" means a structure designed
according to the International Residential Codes or its predecessor codes.
(b) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in an amount equal to the lesser of:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the total cost of the construction,
acquisition, and installation of a qualified storm shelter at the primary
residence of the taxpayer during the tax year, excluding any costs reimbursed
or expected to be reimbursed by another entity, including without limitation
insurance reimbursement, grants, or other government subsidies or incentives;
or
(2) Three thousand dollars ($3,000).
(c) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may be
claimed by the taxpayer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of income
tax due by the taxpayer.
(d)(1) The total amount of income tax credits that may be awarded
under this section shall not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) for all
taxpayers in a calendar year.
(2) Before claiming an income tax credit under this section, a
taxpayer shall file an informational report in the manner prescribed by the
Division of Emergency Management that includes information showing:
(A) The costs for construction, acquisition, and
installation of a qualified storm shelter at the primary residence of the
taxpayer; and
(B) Any additional information required by the division.
(3)(A) Upon receipt of an informational report containing the
information required under this subsection, the division shall issue an
income tax credit certificate to the taxpayer submitting the informational
report.
(B) Income tax credit certificates issued under
subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section shall be issued on a first-come, first-
served basis until the maximum amount of income tax credits stated in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section is met.
01/30/2025 9:06:18 AM JLL126

HB1366
(C) If the maximum amount of income tax credits stated in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section is met:
(i) The division shall notify each taxpayer who has
submitted an informational report under this subsection but who will not
receive an income tax credit certificate because the maximum amount stated in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section has been met that no additional income tax
credit certificates will be issued for the tax year; and
(ii) Notwithstanding any other restrictions stated
in this section, each taxpayer notified under subdivision (d)(3)(C)(i) of
this section is allowed to resubmit his or her informational report under
this subsection in the next tax year.
(e)(1) The division shall prepare an annual report detailing the
number of qualified storm shelters constructed, acquired, and installed and
the amount of income tax credits allowed under this section during the
previous calendar year.
(2) The report required under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Contain information that is consistent with any rules
adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration; and
(B) Be submitted to the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(f) The division and the department may adopt rules to implement and
administer this section.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.










01/30/2025 9:06:18 AM JLL126